North Carolina statutes. Chapter 46. Partition.
Article 4. Partition of Personal Property. [Repealed]

§ 46-42.

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-100

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(pp), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-43.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-101(b) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(qq), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-43.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-101(c) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(rr), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-44.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-102

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(ss), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§§ 46-45,
46-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 719, s. 2.